Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2923
Biennial report.

(1)
A limited cooperative association or a foreign limited cooperative association
authorized to transact business in this state shall deliver to the Secretary
of State for filing a biennial report that states:

(a) The name of the limited cooperative association or foreign limited
cooperative association;

(b) The street and mailing addresses of the limited cooperative association's
or foreign limited cooperative association's designated office and the name
and street and mailing addresses of its agent for service of process in this
state;

(c) In the case of a limited cooperative association, the street and
mailing addresses of its principal office if different from its designated
office; and

(d) In the case of a foreign limited cooperative association, the state
or other jurisdiction under whose law the foreign limited cooperative association
is formed and any alternative name adopted under section 21-29,106.

(2) Information in the biennial report must be current as of the date
the biennial report is delivered to the Secretary of State.

(3) Commencing on January 1, 2009, a biennial report shall be filed
between January 1 and April 1 of each odd-numbered year following the year
in which a limited cooperative association files articles of organization
or a foreign limited cooperative association becomes authorized to transact
business in this state.

(4) If a biennial report does not contain the information required in
subsection (1) of this section, the Secretary of State shall promptly notify
the reporting limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative
association and return the report for correction. If the report is corrected
to contain the information required in subsection (1) of this section and
delivered to the Secretary of State within thirty days after the effective
date of the notice, it is timely delivered.

(5) If a filed biennial report contains an address of a designated office
or the name or address of an agent for service of process which differs from
the information shown in the records of the Secretary of State immediately
before the filing, the differing information in the biennial report is considered
a statement of change under section 21-2914.

(6) If a limited cooperative association fails to file a biennial report
under this section, the Secretary of State may proceed under section 21-2994
to administratively dissolve the limited cooperative association.

(7) If a foreign limited cooperative association fails to file a biennial
report under this section, the Secretary of State may proceed under section
21-29,107 to revoke the certificate of authority of the foreign limited cooperative
association.

(8) A correction or an
amendment to the biennial report may be delivered to the Secretary of State
for filing at any time.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 23;

Laws 2014, LB774, § 4.